Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-537
City with home rule charter; city council; qualifications; nominating petition or filing fee.

(1) In a city which adopts a home rule charter pursuant to sections 19-501 to 19-503 and Article XI, sections 2 to 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska, the number of city council members shall be determined by the home rule charter. The council members of a city of the metropolitan class which adopts a home rule charter shall meet the qualifications found in sections 14-204 and 14-230.

(2) Any city having a home rule charter may provide in such charter for a nominating petition or filing fee or both for any person desiring to be a candidate for the office of council member or mayor.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 133.